Illinois, session 104th, HB2999.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by adding Section 55-12024 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-12024 new)7    Sec. 5-12024. Industrialized residential structures and 8manufactured homes.9    (a) As used in this subsection, "pre-owned manufactured 10home" means a manufactured home that has been previously used 11as a residential dwelling and has been titled. 12    (b) Except as provided in Section 5-12001, a zoning 13ordinance or other zoning regulation of a county other than a 14home rule county may not prohibit or restrict the erection of 15an industrialized residential structure, as defined in Section 165 of the Industrialized Residential Structure Deed Restriction 17Act, or a manufactured home, as defined in Section 10 of the 18Manufactured Home Quality Assurance Act, on real property if:19        (1) the industrialized residential structure or 20    manufactured home is compatible with the character of 21    other residential structures in the county;22        (2) an ordinance or regulation of the county imposes 23    the same aesthetic compatibility requirements on the   HB2999- 2 -LRB104 03297 RTM 13319 b1    industrialized residential structure or manufactured home 2    as those aesthetic compatibility requirements that are 3    applicable to all residential structures in the county; 4    and5        (3) the industrialized residential structure or 6    manufactured home meets applicable standards for the 7    exterior design of buildings and structures.8    Restrictions prohibited by this subsection include 9restrictions of a manufactured home based upon the age of the 10manufactured home. 11    (c) A person who is the owner of real property or who has a 12right to the use of real property may install and occupy a 13pre-owned manufactured home on a property if the pre-owned 14manufactured home complies with restrictions allowed under 15subsection (b) and is located on property zoned for 16residential use.17    (d) A county may establish health and safety standards for 18pre-owned manufactured homes that are relocated from one 19location to another location and an inspection program for 20those pre-owned manufactured homes. The county and the 21individual performing an inspection are not liable for any 22injuries to a person resulting from any defects or conditions 23in the pre-owned manufactured home.24    (e) This Section is not intended to and does not limit the 25powers of a home rule county.    HB2999- 3 -LRB104 03297 RTM 13319 b1    Section 10. The Township Code is amended by adding Section 2110-18 as follows: 3    (60 ILCS 1/110-18 new)4    Sec. 110-18. Industrialized residential structures and 5manufactured homes.6    (a) As used in this subsection, "pre-owned manufactured 7home" means a manufactured home that has been previously used 8as a residential dwelling and has been titled. 9    (b) Except as provided in Section 110-10, a zoning 10ordinance or other zoning regulation of a township may not 11prohibit or restrict the erection of an industrialized 12residential structure, as defined in Section 5 of the 13Industrialized Residential Structure Deed Restriction Act, or 14a manufactured home, as defined in Section 10 of the 15Manufactured Home Quality Assurance Act, on real property if:16        (1) the industrialized residential structure or 17    manufactured home is compatible with the character of 18    other residential structures in the township;19        (2) an ordinance or regulation of the township imposes 20    the same aesthetic compatibility requirements on the 21    industrialized residential structure or manufactured home 22    as those aesthetic compatibility requirements that are 23    applicable to all residential structures in the township; 24    and25        (3) the industrialized residential structure or   HB2999- 4 -LRB104 03297 RTM 13319 b1    manufactured home meets applicable standards for the 2    exterior design of buildings and structures.3    Restrictions prohibited by this subsection include 4restrictions of a manufactured home based upon the age of the 5manufactured home. 6    (c) A person who is the owner of real property or who has a 7right to the use of real property may install and occupy a 8pre-owned manufactured home on a property if the pre-owned 9manufactured home complies with restrictions allowed under 10subsection (b) and is located on property zoned for 11residential use.12    (d) A township may establish health and safety standards 13for pre-owned manufactured homes that are relocated from one 14location to another location and an inspection program for 15those pre-owned manufactured homes. The township and the 16individual performing an inspection are not liable for any 17injuries to a person resulting from any defects or conditions 18in the pre-owned manufactured home. 19    Section 15. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 20adding Section 11-13-30 as follows: 21    (65 ILCS 5/11-13-30 new)22    Sec. 11-13-30. Industrialized residential structures and 23manufactured homes.24    (a) As used in this subsection, "pre-owned manufactured   HB2999- 5 -LRB104 03297 RTM 13319 b1home" means a manufactured home that has been previously used 2as a residential dwelling and has been titled. 3    (b) Except as provided in Sections 11-12-5 and 11-13-1, a 4zoning ordinance or other zoning regulation of a municipality 5other than a home rule municipality may not prohibit or 6restrict the erection of an industrialized residential 7structure, as defined in Section 5 of the Industrialized 8Residential Structure Deed Restriction Act, or a manufactured 9home, as defined in Section 10 of the Manufactured Home 10Quality Assurance Act, on real property if:11        (1) the industrialized residential structure or 12    manufactured home is compatible with the character of 13    other residential structures in the municipality;14        (2) an ordinance or regulation of the municipality 15    imposes the same aesthetic compatibility requirements on 16    the industrialized residential structure or manufactured 17    home as those aesthetic compatibility requirements that 18    are applicable to all residential structures in the 19    municipality; and20        (3) the industrialized residential structure or 21    manufactured home meets applicable standards for the 22    exterior design of buildings and structures.23    Restrictions prohibited by this subsection include 24restrictions of a manufactured home based upon the age of the 25manufactured home. 26    (c) A person who is the owner of real property or who has a   HB2999- 6 -LRB104 03297 RTM 13319 b1right to the use of real property may install and occupy a 2pre-owned manufactured home on a property if the pre-owned 3manufactured home complies with restrictions allowed under 4subsection (b) and is located on property zoned for 5residential use.6    (d) A municipality may establish health and safety 7standards for pre-owned manufactured homes that are relocated 8from one location to another location and an inspection 9program for those pre-owned manufactured homes. The 10municipality and the individual performing an inspection are 11not liable for any injuries to a person resulting from any 12defects or conditions in the pre-owned manufactured home.13    (e) This Section is not intended to and does not limit the 14powers of a home rule municipality.